Missouri, session 2026, SB1715.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 386, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 386.1150, to read as
follows:
386.1150. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Public counsel", the Missouri office of the
public counsel;
(3) "Protected person", an employee of a public
utility, who has reported to the proper authorities an
unlawful act, serious misconduct that violates public
policy, or any other violation promulgated by a statute,
rule, regulation, or any other provision of law by a public
utility; or an employee of the public utility who refused to
carry out a directive by the public utility that if
completed would be a violation of the law, rule, or
regulation of the commission. "Protected person" includes
any person serving on a board of directors, any person
serving in leadership roles, such as executives, managers,

SB 1715 2
supervisors, or any employee, applicant, former employee, or
contractor subject to the authority of the commission;
(4) "Public utility", the same as defined in section
386.020.
2. The commission and public counsel shall each
designate counsel to stand as ombudsman who shall accept any
complaint or information provided by a protected person as
to any act or omission by a public utility that violates
current law or any rule or regulation promulgated by the
commission under this chapter.
3. Any information provided to the ombudsman under
this section pertaining to the identity of the protected
person shall be kept confidential and a closed record under
chapter 610.
4. Any information provided to the ombudsman
pertaining to a rate case shall be placed in an official
rate case file, but any information pertaining to the
identity of the protected person under this section shall be
redacted.
5. The commission and public counsel shall each have
the power to investigate or make an inquiry as to any act or
omission by a public utility based on a complaint or
information provided by a protected person under this
section.
6. After receiving the complaint or information by a
protected person, the commission and public counsel shall:
(1) Both confirm receipt of the complaint or
information to the protected person;
(2) Provide an opportunity for the protected person to
meet with an investigator investigating or making an inquiry
as to any act or omission by the public utility under
subsection 5 of this section;

SB 1715 3
(3) Provide an opportunity for the protected person to
rebut any denial by the public utility pertaining to any act
or omission by the public utility that is being
investigated; and
(4) Provide an opportunity for the protected person to
comment on a preliminary investigative report pertaining to
any act or omission by the public utility, if any, that has
been investigated under subsection 5 of this section.
7. Any rebuttal, denial, or any comments under
subsection 6 of this section shall be included in the record
of the complaint.
8. The commission and public counsel shall both send
notification to the protected person of the final result of
the investigation pertaining to any act or omission by the
public utility under this section.
9. A protected person under this section shall have
the same remedies as a protected person under section
285.575.
10. The commission shall promulgate rules to enforce
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓